Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.405.370

Adverse change in contract status of certificated employee, including nonrenewal of contract—Appeal from—Other statutes not applicable.

The provisions of chapter 28A.645 RCW shall not be applicable to RCW 28A.405.300 through 28A.405.360.

[ 1990 c 33 s 400; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.510. Prior: 1961 c 241 s 8. Formerly RCW 28A.58.510, 28.58.510.]